search/conf/lt_LT_utf8.aff
SFX U Y 262
SFX U ti      t               ti        
SFX U ti      davau           ti        
SFX U ti      davai           ti        
SFX U ti      davo            ti        
SFX U ti      davome          ti        
SFX U ti      davom           ti        
SFX U ti      davote          ti        
SFX U ti      davot           ti        
SFX U tis     davausi         tis       
SFX U tis     davaisi         tis       
SFX U tis     davosi          tis       
SFX U tis     davomės         tis       
SFX U tis     davotės         tis       
SFX U ti      siu             ti        
SFX U ti      si              ti        
SFX U ti      s               ti        
SFX U ūti     us              ūti       
SFX U yti     is              yti       
SFX U ti      sime            ti        
SFX U ti      sim             ti        
SFX U ti      site            ti        
SFX U ti      sit             ti        
SFX U ti      siuosi          tis       
SFX U ti      siesi           tis       
SFX U ti      sis             tis       
SFX U ti      simės           tis       
SFX U ti      sitės           tis       
SFX U ti      čiau            ti        
SFX U ti      tum             ti        
SFX U ti      tumei           ti        
SFX U ti      tų              ti        
SFX U ti      tume            ti        
SFX U ti      tumėme          ti        
SFX U ti      tumėm           ti        
SFX U ti      tumėte          ti        
SFX U ti      tumėt           ti        
SFX U ti      tute            ti        
SFX U ti      tut             ti        
SFX U tis     čiausi          tis       
SFX U tis     tumeis          tis       
SFX U tis     tumeisi         tis       
SFX U tis     tųsi            tis       
SFX U tis     tumės           tis       
SFX U tis     tumėmės         tis       
SFX U tis     tumėtės         tis       
SFX U tis     tutės           tis       
SFX U ti      k               ti        
SFX U ti      kime            ti        
SFX U ti      kim             ti        
SFX U ti      kite            ti        
SFX U ti      kit             ti        
SFX U tis     kis             tis       
SFX U tis     kimės           tis       
SFX U tis     kitės           tis       
SFX U ti      damas           ti        
SFX U ti      dama            ti        
SFX U ti      dami            ti        
SFX U ti      damos           ti        
SFX U tis     damasis         tis       
SFX U tis     damasi          tis       
SFX U tis     damiesi         tis       
SFX U tis     damosi          tis       
SFX U ti      davus           ti        
SFX U tis     davusis         tis       
SFX U ti      siantis         ti        
SFX U ti      davęs           ti        
SFX U ti      davusio         ti        
SFX U ti      davusiam        ti        
SFX U ti      davusį          ti        
SFX U ti      davusiu         ti        
SFX U ti      davusiame       ti        
SFX U ti      davę            ti        
SFX U ti      davusių         ti        
SFX U ti      davusiems       ti        
SFX U ti      davusius        ti        
SFX U ti      davusiais       ti        
SFX U ti      davusiuose      ti        
SFX U ti      davusi          ti        
SFX U ti      davusios        ti        
SFX U ti      davusiai        ti        
SFX U ti      davusią         ti        
SFX U ti      davusia         ti        
SFX U ti      davusioje       ti        
SFX U ti      davusioj        ti        
SFX U ti      davusioms       ti        
SFX U ti      davusias        ti        
SFX U ti      davusiomis      ti        
SFX U ti      davusiose       ti        
SFX U ti      davusysis       ti        
SFX U ti      davusiojo       ti        
SFX U ti      davusiajam      ti        
SFX U ti      davusįjį        ti        
SFX U ti      davusiuoju      ti        
SFX U ti      davusiajame     ti        
SFX U ti      davusieji       ti        
SFX U ti      davusiųjų       ti        
SFX U ti      davusiesiems    ti        
SFX U ti      davusiuosius    ti        
SFX U ti      davusiaisiais   ti        
SFX U ti      davusiuosiuose  ti        
SFX U ti      davusioji       ti        
SFX U ti      davusiosios     ti        
SFX U ti      davusiajai      ti        
SFX U ti      davusiąją       ti        
SFX U ti      davusiąja       ti        
SFX U ti      davusiojoje     ti        
SFX U ti      davusiojoj      ti        
SFX U ti      davusiosioms    ti        
SFX U ti      davusiąsias     ti        
SFX U ti      davusiosiomis   ti        
SFX U ti      davusiosiose    ti        
SFX U ti      siąs            ti        
SFX U ti      siančio         ti        
SFX U ti      siančiam        ti        
SFX U ti      siantį          ti        
SFX U ti      siančiu         ti        
SFX U ti      siančiame       ti        
SFX U ti      sią             ti        
SFX U ti      siančių         ti        
SFX U ti      siantiems       ti        
SFX U ti      siančius        ti        
SFX U ti      siančiais       ti        
SFX U ti      siančiuose      ti        
SFX U ti      sianti          ti        
SFX U ti      siančios        ti        
SFX U ti      siančiai        ti        
SFX U ti      siančią         ti        
SFX U ti      siančia         ti        
SFX U ti      siančioje       ti        
SFX U ti      siančioj        ti        
SFX U ti      siančioms       ti        
SFX U ti      siančias        ti        
SFX U ti      siančiomis      ti        
SFX U ti      siančiose       ti        
SFX U ti      siantysis       ti        
SFX U ti      siančiojo       ti        
SFX U ti      siančiajam      ti        
SFX U ti      siantįjį        ti        
SFX U ti      siančiuoju      ti        
SFX U ti      siančiajame     ti        
SFX U ti      siantieji       ti        
SFX U ti      siančiųjų       ti        
SFX U ti      siantiesiems    ti        
SFX U ti      siančiuosius    ti        
SFX U ti      siančiaisiais   ti        
SFX U ti      siančiuosiuose  ti        
SFX U ti      siančioji       ti        
SFX U ti      siančiosios     ti        
SFX U ti      siančiajai      ti        
SFX U ti      siančiąją       ti        
SFX U ti      siančiąja       ti        
SFX U ti      siančiojoje     ti        
SFX U ti      siančiojoj      ti        
SFX U ti      siančiosioms    ti        
SFX U ti      siančiąsias     ti        
SFX U ti      siančiosiomis   ti        
SFX U ti      siančiosiose    ti        
SFX U ti      tas             ti        
SFX U ti      to              ti        
SFX U ti      tam             ti        
SFX U ti      tą              ti        
SFX U ti      tu              ti        
SFX U ti      tame            ti        
SFX U ti      ti              ti        
SFX U ti      tiems           ti        
SFX U ti      tus             ti        
SFX U ti      tais            ti        
SFX U ti      tuose           ti        
SFX U ti      ta              ti        
SFX U ti      tos             ti        
SFX U ti      tai             ti        
SFX U ti      toje            ti        
SFX U ti      toj             ti        
SFX U ti      toms            ti        
SFX U ti      tomis           ti        
SFX U ti      tose            ti        
SFX U ti      tasis           ti        
SFX U ti      tojo            ti        
SFX U ti      tajam           ti        
SFX U ti      tąjį            ti        
SFX U ti      tuoju           ti        
SFX U ti      tajame          ti        
SFX U ti      tieji           ti        
SFX U ti      tųjų            ti        
SFX U ti      tiesiems        ti        
SFX U ti      tuosius         ti        
SFX U ti      taisiais        ti        
SFX U ti      tuosiuose       ti        
SFX U ti      toji            ti        
SFX U ti      tosios          ti        
SFX U ti      tajai           ti        
SFX U ti      tąją            ti        
SFX U ti      tąja            ti        
SFX U ti      tojoje          ti        
